test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-hansja1_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - hansʼa: # Noun (1) hansʼa 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     hans'a+N+Sg+Nom: hans'a
     hans'a+N+Sg+Gen: hans'a
     hans'a+N+Sg+Par: hans'at
     hans'a+N+Sg+Ill: [hans'ahtõ, hans'adõ]
     hans'a+N+Sg+Ine: [hans'an, hans'ah, hans'ahn]
     hans'a+N+Sg+Ela: hans'ast
     hans'a+N+Sg+All: hans'alõ
     hans'a+N+Sg+Ade: hans'al
     hans'a+N+Sg+Abl: hans'alt
     hans'a+N+Sg+Tra: hans'as
     hans'a+N+Sg+Ter: hans'aniq
     hans'a+N+Sg+Abe: hans'aldaq
     hans'a+N+Sg+Com: hans'agaq
     hans'a+N+Pl+Nom: hans'aq
     hans'a+N+Pl+Gen: hans'adõ
     hans'a+N+Pl+Par: [hans'asit, hans'asiid]
     hans'a+N+Pl+Ill: [hans'adõhe, hans'adõdõ]
     hans'a+N+Pl+Ine: [hans'adõn, hans'adõh, hans'adõhn]
     hans'a+N+Pl+Ela: hans'adõst
     hans'a+N+Pl+All: hans'adõlõ
     hans'a+N+Pl+Ade: hans'adõl
     hans'a+N+Pl+Abl: hans'adõlt
     hans'a+N+Pl+Tra: hans'adõs
     hans'a+N+Pl+Ter: hans'adõniq
     hans'a+N+Pl+Abe: hans'adõldaq
     hans'a+N+Pl+Com: hans'adõgaq
